Indiana, session 2026, HB1428.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-235 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 235. "Minor", for
purposes of IC 16-19-3-4.7 and IC 16-36, means an individual who is
less than eighteen (18) years of age.
SECTION 2. IC 16-19-3-4.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.7. (a) As used in this section, "lifeguard"
refers to an individual who holds a nationally recognized
certification in lifeguard training that is responsible for supervising
swimming activities and ensuring water safety.
(b) As used in this section, "pool" means a structure, basin,
chamber, or tank containing an artificial body of water for
swimming, bathing, relaxation, or recreational use that has a
surface area of two thousand (2,000) square feet or more.
(c) As used in this section, "senior neighborhood" means a
residential community where occupancy is restricted to individuals
who are at least fifty-five (55) years of age.
2026 IN 1428—LS 6950/DI 104


(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), a senior neighborhood
may not be required to have a lifeguard on duty at the
neighborhood's pool if the following conditions are met:
(1) The pool is not deeper than six (6) feet in any section of the
pool.
(2) The pool does not have a diving board, diving well, or
water slide.
(e) If a senior neighborhood decides to hold visiting hours to
allow visiting minors to swim in the pool, the senior neighborhood
must have a lifeguard on duty during the hours of the day
designated by the senior community's governing board to permit
visiting minors to use the pool. A minor may not use the senior
neighborhood pool outside of the designated visiting hours. The
senior neighborhood shall adopt and enforce rules to ensure
compliance with this subsection.
(f) A senior neighborhood that decides not to employ a lifeguard
for the pool and establishes pool visiting hours for minors as
allowed under this section shall post clear and conspicuous signage
at each pool entrance that states the following:
"No lifeguard on duty-swim at your own risk".
"Children under 18 are allowed at the pool during visiting
hours only".
The senior neighborhood shall ensure that the signage is
maintained in good condition and comply with any applicable state
or local regulations.
(g) A senior neighborhood that decides not to employ a lifeguard
for the pool and not to establish pool visiting hours for minors shall
post clear and conspicuous signage at each pool entrance that
states the following:
"No lifeguard on duty- swim at your own risk".
"Children under 18 are not allowed at the pool".
The senior neighborhood shall ensure that the signage is
maintained in good condition and comply with any applicable state
or local regulations.
(h) A senior neighborhood shall notify residents concerning the
rules regarding pool use, including the visiting hours, if any, in
which a minor may use the pool.
(i) The state department may assess a senior neighborhood a
fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation of this section.
SECTION 3. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The Indiana
department of health shall amend 410 IAC 6-2.1 to conform with
this act. The Indiana department of health shall inform local health
2026 IN 1428—LS 6950/DI 104


departments concerning the changes concerning pools contained in
this act.
(b) This SECTION expires December 31, 2027.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1428—LS 6950/DI 104